Hawaii, session 2025, GM1324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 286-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (b) as follows:
3 "(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) [and-ocction 291C-
4 i^] , no person shall operate a moped or motor scooter leased
5 from a rental company on any roadway in the State unless the
6 person wears a safety helmet, which shall be provided by the
7 rental company unless the person provides the person's own
8 safety helmet; provided that this subsection shall not apply to
9 persons who possess a valid license under this chapter to
10 operate a motorcycle or an equivalent license issued from
11 another state. To meet the requirements of this subsection, the
12 safety helmet shall meet the specifications and requirements
13 established by rules adopted by the director."
14 SECTION 2. Section 291C-195, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
15 amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
16 "(a) Notwithstanding section 286-81 (b), no person:
2025-2852 SB30 CDl SMA.docx

Page 2 30
S.B. NO
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
1 (1) Less than sixteen years of age shall drive a
2 moped on a highway, street, or roadway, or any other
3 public property in the State; and
4 (2) [Lean than--eightccn years of-ago shall] Shadd, drive a
5 moped unless the person wears a safety helmet securely
6 fastened with a chin strap.
7 The safety helmet shall meet the specifications and requirements
8 established by rules adopted by the director."
9 SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
10 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
11 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2852 SB30 CDl SMA.docx 2
wiiminiiiiiiiniinii

30
S.B. NO
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 30, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
97

SB No. 30, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives